Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.193

Poisoning animals—Strychnine sales—Records—Report on suspected purchases.

(1) It is unlawful for any person other than a registered pharmacist to sell at retail or furnish to any person any strychnine: PROVIDED, That nothing herein prohibits county, state, or federal agents, in the course of their duties, from furnishing strychnine to any person. Every such registered pharmacist selling or furnishing such strychnine shall, before delivering the same, record the transaction as provided in RCW 69.38.030. If any such registered pharmacist suspects that any person desiring to purchase strychnine intends to use the same for the purpose of poisoning unlawfully any domestic animal or domestic bird, he or she may refuse to sell to such person, but whether or not he or she makes such sale, he or she shall if he or she so suspects an intention to use the strychnine unlawfully, immediately notify the nearest peace officer, giving such officer a complete description of the person purchasing, or attempting to purchase, such strychnine.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 112; 1987 c 34 s 7; 1941 c 105 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 3207-2. Formerly RCW 18.67.110.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.